Utah statutes.
57-8a-306.   Costs and attorney fees in lien enforcement action.

(1)  A court entering a judgment or decree in a judicial action brought under this part shall award the prevailing party its costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred before the judgment or decree and, if the association is the prevailing party, any costs and reasonable attorney fees that the association incurs collecting the judgment.

(2)  In a nonjudicial foreclosure, an association may include in the amount due, and may collect, all costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in collecting the amount due, including the costs of preparing, recording, and foreclosing a lien.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

